Hawaii statutes.
§150-28 Laboratory and analytical
procedure. (a) The department shall maintain a properly equipped
laboratory for making tests required under this chapter.

(b) The method of sampling and testing of seed
shall be based upon the rules for seed testing adopted by the Association of
Official Seed Analysts or as published in subchapter K of the Federal Seed Act.
[L 1945, c 90, pt of §2; RL 1955, §26-12; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961,
c 132, §2; HRS §150-28; am L 1987, c 164, §10]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next